Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5084YC (5) 91 mb/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 39A. a. Adopt a policy requiring that not 3 less than eighty percent of the students who are accepted into 4 the bachelor of science in nursing program at the college of 5 nursing at the state university of Iowa be residents of Iowa. 6 b. Adopt a policy that gives priority for admission to 7 residents of Iowa who apply to the bachelor of science in 8 nursing program at the state university of Iowa. 9 c. Adopt a policy requiring an application for admission 10 to the bachelor of science in nursing program at the state 11 university of Iowa to include an applicant attestation that 12 includes all of the following: 13 (1) I was born in Iowa or graduated from an Iowa high 14 school. 15 (2) I was not born in Iowa or did not graduate from an Iowa 16 high school; however, I am interested in working in Iowa after 17 graduation. 18 (3) I was not born in Iowa or did not graduate from an 19 Iowa high school; however, I am interested in enrolling in the 20 bachelor of science in nursing program at the state university 21 of Iowa. 22 d. (1) Require the state university of Iowa to submit an 23 annual report to the general assembly that contains, for the 24 immediately preceding calendar year, all of the following: 25 (a) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa who 26 were accepted to the bachelor of science in nursing program. 27 (b) The number of applicants who are residents of Iowa 28 who were not accepted to the bachelor of science in nursing 29 program, and a brief statement related to why each applicant 30 was denied. 31 (2) Personal information regarding an applicant in an 32 annual report submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall 33 be kept confidential as required under the federal Family 34 Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. Â§1252g, and in 35 -1- LSB 5084YC (5) 91 mb/jh 1/ 2 H.F. _____ the same manner as personal information in student records 1 maintained, created, collected, or assembled by or for a school 2 corporation or education institution in accordance with section 3 22.7, subsection 1. 4 e. For purposes of this subsection: 5 (1) âBachelor of science in nursing programâ means the 6 undergraduate bachelor of science in nursing degree program 7 offered by the college of nursing at the state university of 8 Iowa. 9 (2) âResident of Iowaâ means an individual who graduated 10 from an Iowa high school. 11